test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-klasse5_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vååjnedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel -åå-
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Inf: vååjnedh
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vååjnem
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vååjnh
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vååjnoe
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vååjnoen
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vååjneden, vååjnijidien]
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vååjnijægan
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vååjnebe, vååjnijibie]
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vååjnede, vååjnijidie]
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vååjnoeh
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vååjnim
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vååjnih
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vååjni
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: vååjnimen
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: vååjniden
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: vååjnigan
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vååjnimh
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vååjnidh
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vååjnin
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vååjnh
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [vååjneden, vååjnijidien]
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [vååjnede, vååjnijidie] 
    vååjnedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vååjnh
    vååjnedh+V+IV+Ger: vååjneminie
    vååjnedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vååjneme
    vååjnedh+V+IV+VGen: vååjnen

  Verb - boltedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel -o-
    boltedh+V+IV+Inf:         boltedh
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: boltem
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bolth
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: boltoe
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: boltoen
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [bolteden, boltijidien]
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: boltijægan
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [boltebe, boltijibie]
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [boltede, boltijidie]
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: boltoeh
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: boltim
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: boltih
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: bolti
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: boltimen
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: boltiden
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: boltigan
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: boltimh
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: boltidh
    boltedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: boltin
    boltedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2:   bolth
    boltedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2:   [bolteden, boltijidien]
    boltedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2:   [boltede, boltijidie] 
    boltedh+V+IV+ConNeg:      bolth
    boltedh+V+IV+Ger:         bolteminie
    boltedh+V+IV+PrfPrc:      bolteme
    boltedh+V+IV+VGen:        bolten 



#  Verb - byssedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel -y-

  Verb - byssedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel -o-
    byssedh+V+IV+Inf:         byssedh
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: byssem
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: byssh
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: byssoe
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: byssoen
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [bysseden, byssijidien]
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: byssijægan
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [byssebe, byssijibie]
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [byssede, byssijidie]
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: byssoeh
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: byssim
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: byssih
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: byssi
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: byssimen
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: byssiden
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: byssigan
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: byssimh
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: byssidh
    byssedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: byssin
    byssedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2:   byssh
    byssedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2:   [bysseden, byssijidien]
    byssedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2:   [byssede, byssijidie] 
    byssedh+V+IV+ConNeg:      byssh
    byssedh+V+IV+Ger:         bysseminie
    byssedh+V+IV+PrfPrc:      bysseme
    byssedh+V+IV+VGen:        byssen 



#  Verb - byögkedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel -yö-

  Verb - byögkedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel -o-
    byögkedh+V+IV+Inf:         byögkedh
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: byögkem
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: byögkh
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: byögkoe
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: byögkoen
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [byögkeden, byögkijidien]
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: byögkijægan
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [byögkebe, byögkijibie]
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [byögkede, byögkijidie]
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: byögkoeh
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: byögkim
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: byögkih
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: byögki
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: byögkimen
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: byögkiden
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: byögkigan
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: byögkimh
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: byögkidh
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: byögkin
    byögkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2:   byögkh
    byögkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2:   [byögkeden, byögkijidien]
    byögkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2:   [byögkede, byögkijidie] 
    byögkedh+V+IV+ConNeg:      byögkh
    byögkedh+V+IV+Ger:         byögkeminie
    byögkedh+V+IV+PrfPrc:      byögkeme
    byögkedh+V+IV+VGen:        byögken 


#  Verb - saasnedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel -aa- - Variant av -åå-? Skal det vera gruppe V? Eller gruppe III?



# TV verbs - XXX:
  Verb - lyjhkedh: # verb 5, stem -e, root vowel y-
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Inf: lyjhkedh
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lyjhkem
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lyjhkh
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lyjhkoe
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: lyjhkoen
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [lyjhkeden, lyjhkijidien]
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: lyjhkijægan
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [lyjhkebe, lyjhkijibie]
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [lyjhkede, lyjhkijidie]
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lyjhkoeh
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lyjhkim
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lyjhkih
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lyjhki
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: lyjhkimen
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: lyjhkiden
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: lyjhkigan
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: lyjhkimh
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lyjhkidh
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lyjhkin
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: lyjhkh
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [lyjhkeden, lyjhkijidien]
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [lyjhkede, lyjhkijidie] 
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+ConNeg: lyjhkh
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+Ger: lyjhkeminie
    lyjhkedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: lyjhkeme 
